Hawaii statutes.
[§136-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, "laser pointing device" means any hand-held laser device,
which is not designed as a sighting device for a weapon nor for use in a
medical procedure. This term includes the commercially-available device, which
is commonly known as a "laser pen" or "laser pointer". [L
1999, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next